Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 35. Vocational Education.

Administrative Code. —

For vocational education, see 4 AAC 51.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 334 et seq.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 778 et seq.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents associated with chemistry experiments, shopwork and manual or vocational training. 35 ALR3d 758.

Liability of cosmetology school for injury to patron. 81 ALR4th 444.

Liability of private vocational or trade school for fraud or misrepresentations inducing student to enroll or pay fees. 85 ALR4th 1079.

Sec. 14.35.010.
Acceptance of Act of Congress for vocational education.

The State of Alaska accepts together with the benefits of all respective funds appropriated thereunder, all of the provisions of the Act of Congress approved February 23, 1917, Public Law 347, 64th Congress, entitled: “An Act to provide for the promotion of vocational education; to provide for cooperation with the states in the promotion of such education in agriculture, home economics and trades and industries; to provide for the cooperation of the states in the preparation of teachers of vocational subjects; and to appropriate money and regulate its expenditures,” and Acts amending or supplementing it.

History.

(§ 37-9-1 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For Public Law 347, see former 20 U.S.C. §§ 11-28. 20 U.S.C. 11-14, 16, and 18-27 were repealed by Public Law 105-33 (August 5, 1997). 20 U.S.C. 15 was repealed by Public Law 90-576 (October 16, 1968). 20 U.S.C. 17 was repealed by Public Law 89-554 (September 6, 1966). 20 U.S.C. 28 was repealed by Public Law 104-66 (December 21, 1995).

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Board of Education has all powers in the area of vocational education and vocational rehabilitation required to be vested therein by the Smith-Hughes Act, [former] 20 U.S.C. §§ 11-28, any acts amendatory or supplementary thereto and any rules or regulations or requirements thereunder. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Sec. 14.35.020.
Duties of state Board of Education and Early Development.

The state Board of Education and Early Development serves as the state board for the purposes of any of the Acts described in AS

14.35.010

.

When required by any of the Acts described in AS

14.35.010

, the board shall

prepare, submit, and supervise the administration of the plans for vocational education;

select a state director of vocational education;

establish the minimum qualifications for teachers, supervisors, or directors;

determine the prorated basis on which money shall be available for the salary and necessary travel expenses of the state director of vocational education;

consider the advice of the Alaska Workforce Investment Board established by AS

23.15.550

regarding employment training needs and advise that board in the development of vocational education programs.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to repeal or modify any existing statute.

History.

(§ 37-9-3 ACLA 1949; am § 54 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 61 SLA 1995; am § 6 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “state Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “state Board of Education” in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Administrative Code. —

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

For secondary vocational educational programs, see 4 AAC 51, art. 3.

Sec. 14.35.025.
Duties of the Department of Education and Early Development.

When required by any of the Acts described in AS

14.35.010

, the department shall

cooperate with the appropriate federal agency in the administration of the Act;

do everything necessary to entitle the state to receive money available according to the Act;

represent the state in all matters related to the administration of the Act;

expend and disburse money received according to the Act;

designate the districts, schools, departments, or classes to participate in the benefits of money received according to the Act.

History.

(§ 55 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 18 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (1) substituted “appropriate federal agency” for “United States Department of Health, Education, and Welfare”.

Sec. 14.35.030.
Commissioner of administration as custodian of federal funds.

The commissioner of administration is designated custodian of appropriations made under any of the Acts described in AS

14.35.010

.
The commissioner of administration shall receive and provide for the proper custody and disbursement of all money paid to the state according to any of the Acts.

History.

(§ 37-9-2 ACLA 1949; am § 56 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.35.040.
Payment of expenses of administration. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]